Utah statutes.
23-14-14.   Grants or gifts accepted by division -- Special account.
The Division of Wildlife Resources is authorized to accept grants or gifts of
money, property, water rights or other endowments that will benefit the
wildlife resources of the state. Moneys as received shall be placed in a
special account to be used for specific use as indicated by the grantor.
